Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 15
EXERCISE OF MUNICIPAL POWERS

Law reviews:

For article, "ADR: Important Options for Municipal Government", see 24

C

olo. Law. 1279 (1995).

Section

PART 1 VESTING OF CORPORATE POWERS

PART 2 GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE POWERS

PART 3 GENERAL FINANCIAL POWERS

PART 4 POLICE REGULATIONS

PART 5 REGULATION OF BUSINESSES

PART 6 BUILDING AND FIRE REGULATIONS

PART 7 PUBLIC PROPERTY
AND IMPROVEMENTS

PART 8 LONG-TERM RENTALS
AND LEASEHOLDS

PART 9 MISCELLANEOUS POWERS

PART 10 SOLID WASTE-TO-ENERGY
INCINERATION SYSTEMS

PART 11 MOBILE HOME PARKS